Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202054-2927
Premises, defined.

Premises means land, buildings, vehicles, equipment, pens, holding facilities, and grounds upon which an animal, herd, or flock is or was, housed, kept, located, grazed, or transported.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 27.
November 14, 2020